Nevada, session 83, AB203.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 678A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this
act.
Sec. 1.3. “Label” means written or printed material affixed
to or included with cannabis or a cannabis product to provide
identification or other information.
Sec. 1.5. “Packaging” means the immediate, consumer-
facing wrapper or container in which cannabis or a cannabis
product is packaged.
Sec. 1.7. NRS 678A.010 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
678A.010 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 678A.020 to
-
*AB203_R1*

– 4 –
678A.240, inclusive, and sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 2. NRS 678A.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.450 1. The Board may adopt regulations necessary or
convenient to carry out the provisions of this title. Such regulations
may include, without limitation:
(a) Financial requirements for licensees.
(b) Establishing such education, outreach, investigative and
enforcement mechanisms as the Board deems necessary to ensure
the compliance of a licensee or registrant with the provisions of this
title. Such mechanisms must include, without limitation:
(1) A system to educate, train and certify employees of the
Board which:
(I) Each employee must complete before he or she may
engage in inspections, investigations or audits; and
(II) At a minimum, includes training that is the same or
substantially similar to any training that is required by the Board by
regulation to be completed by a cannabis establishment agent before
he or she may be employed by, volunteer at or provide labor to a
cannabis establishment;
(2) A system to educate and advise licensees and registrants
on compliance with the provisions of this title which may serve as
an alternative to disciplinary action; and
(3) Establishing specific grounds for disciplinary action
against a licensee or registrant who knowingly violates the law or
engages in grossly negligent, unlawful or criminal conduct or an act
or omission that poses an imminent threat to the health or safety of
the public.
(c) Requirements for licensees or registrants relating to the
cultivation, processing, manufacture, transport, distribution, testing,
study, advertising and sale of cannabis and cannabis products.
(d) Policies and procedures to ensure that the cannabis industry
in this State is economically competitive, inclusive of racial
minorities, women and persons and communities that have been
adversely affected by cannabis prohibition and accessible to persons
of low-income seeking to start a business.
(e) Policies and procedures relating to the disclosure of the
identities of the shareholders and the annual report of a cannabis
establishment that is a publicly traded company.
(f) Reasonable restrictions on the signage, marketing, display
and advertising of cannabis establishments. Such a restriction must
not require a cannabis establishment to obtain the approval of the
Board before using a logo, sign or advertisement.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 5 –
(g) Provisions governing the sales of products and commodities
made from hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, or containing
cannabidiol by cannabis establishments.
(h) Requirements relating to the packaging and labeling of
cannabis and cannabis products. Such requirements must not
require:
(1) Any package of cannabis or cannabis products which is
sold at wholesale to contain any label or tag other than a label or
tag necessary for the functionality of any computer software used
for the seed-to-sale tracking of cannabis adopted by the Board.
(2) A cannabis establishment to include any information on
the label for cannabis or a cannabis product that is already
included on the packaging of the cannabis or cannabis product.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
gathering and maintenance of comprehensive demographic
information, including, without limitation, information regarding
race, ethnicity, age and gender, concerning each:
(a) Owner and manager of a cannabis establishment.
(b) Holder of a cannabis establishment agent registration card.
3. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
investigation of unlicensed cannabis activities and the imposition of
penalties against persons who engage in such activities. Such
regulations must, without limitation:
(a) Establish penalties to be imposed for unlicensed cannabis
activities, which may include, without limitation, the issuance of a
cease and desist order or citation, the imposition of an
administrative fine or civil penalty and other similar penalties.
(b) Set forth the procedures by which the Board may impose a
penalty against a person for engaging in unlicensed cannabis
activities.
(c) Set forth the circumstances under which the Board is
required to refer matters concerning unlicensed cannabis activities
to an appropriate state or local law enforcement agency.
4. The Board shall transmit the information gathered and
maintained pursuant to subsection 2 to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Legislature on or
before January 1 of each odd-numbered year.
5. The Board shall, by regulation, establish a pilot program for
identifying opportunities for an emerging small cannabis business to
participate in the cannabis industry. As used in this subsection,
“emerging small cannabis business” means a cannabis-related
business that:
(a) Is in existence, operational and operated for a profit;
(b) Maintains its principal place of business in this State; and
-
*AB203_R1*

– 6 –
(c) Satisfies requirements for the number of employees and
annual gross revenue established by the Board by regulation.
Sec. 3. Chapter 678B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4 and 5 of this act.
Sec. 4. 1. A cannabis sales facility or a third party or
intermediary business with whom the cannabis sales facility has
contracted pursuant to NRS 678C.440 or 678D.430 may, in
accordance with procedures and requirements set forth in this title
and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, deliver cannabis or
cannabis products to a consumer at any location, including,
without limitation, a private residence, so long as the location is
not:
(a) On the property of a public or private school that provides
formal education traditionally associated with preschool or
kindergarten through grade 12;
(b) On the property of a community facility;
(c) On the property of an airport; or
(d) Except for a delivery conducted at an authorized private
residence, within 1,500 feet of an establishment that holds a
nonrestricted gaming license described in subsection 1 or 2 of
NRS 463.0177.
2. The Board may not require any vehicle used by a cannabis
sales facility or a third party or intermediary business with whom
the cannabis sales facility has contracted pursuant to NRS
678C.440 or 678D.430 to deliver cannabis or cannabis products to
a consumer to be inspected by the Board before the vehicle is used
to make such a delivery.
3. For the purposes of paragraph (d) of subsection 1, the
distance must be measured in a straight line from the closest
points of the property line of the property at which the delivery of
cannabis or cannabis products is completed and the property line
of the establishment that holds a nonrestricted gaming license
described in subsection 1 or 2 of NRS 463.0177.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Authorized private residence” means a residential unit
that is not:
(1) Connected, rented, leased or adjacent to, leased by or
otherwise located in the same building as an establishment that
holds a nonrestricted gaming license described in subsection 1 or
2 of NRS 463.0177; or
(2) Owned, in whole or in part, operated, rented, leased or
managed by, leased to or managed for:
(I) The holder of a nonrestricted restricted gaming
license described in subsection 1 or 2 of NRS 463.0177 or the
affiliate, as defined in NRS 78.412, of such a person; or
-
*AB203_R1*

– 7 –
(II) A person who has been licensed, registered, found
suitable or received a preliminary finding of suitability by the
Nevada Gaming Commission.
(b) “Community facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678B.250.
(c) “Private residence” includes, without limitation:
(1) A residential unit that is rented for the purposes of
transient lodging, as defined in NRS 244.35354.
(2) A mobile home, as defined in NRS 40.215, that is
located within a mobile home park, as defined in NRS 40.215.
(3) A recreational vehicle, as defined in NRS 40.215, that is
located within a recreational vehicle park, as defined in
NRS 40.215.
(4) A manufactured home, as defined in NRS 118B.015,
that is located within a manufactured home park, as defined in
NRS 118B.017.
(d) “Residential unit” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 244.353535.
Sec. 5. 1. A social equity operator may enter into a joint-
venture agreement with a cannabis cultivation facility or cannabis
production facility to allow the social equity operator to operate a
joint-venture business on the premises of the cannabis cultivation
facility or cannabis production facility.
2. A joint-venture agreement entered into pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) Must be submitted to and approved by the Board before it
may become effective;
(b) Must comply with the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to this section; and
(c) May provide for the sharing of profits between the joint-
venture business and the cannabis cultivation facility or cannabis
production facility, as applicable.
3. If the Board approves a joint-venture agreement entered
into pursuant to subsection 1, the cannabis cultivation facility or
cannabis production facility shall notify the local governmental
jurisdiction in which the facility is located of the approval.
4. Each owner, officer and board member of a joint-venture
business and each person who volunteers or works at or contracts
to provide labor for the joint-venture business must obtain and
maintain a cannabis establishment agent registration card.
5. A joint-venture business may engage in any activity in
which the cannabis cultivation facility or cannabis production
facility that is a party to the joint-venture agreement is authorized
to engage. A joint-venture business shall comply with all
provisions of this title and the regulations adopted pursuant
-
*AB203_R1*

– 8 –
thereto applicable to a cannabis cultivation facility or cannabis
production facility, as applicable.
6. All operations of a joint-venture business must be
conducted on the premises of the cannabis cultivation facility or
cannabis production facility that is a party to the joint-venture
agreement.
7. The Board shall adopt regulations governing joint-venture
agreements and joint-venture businesses. The regulations must:
(a) Set forth requirements for the required content of a joint-
venture agreement entered into pursuant to this section.
(b) Establish criteria to be used by the Board for determining
whether a person qualifies as a social equity operator for the
purposes of this section, including, without limitation, the
minimum percentage of ownership in a proposed joint-venture
business which will be held by a person or group of persons who
have been adversely affected by provisions of previous laws which
criminalized activity relating to cannabis for the person to qualify
as a social equity operator.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Board member” means a natural person who is proposed
to sit on the board of a proposed joint-venture business and who
may or may not be an owner of the joint-venture business.
(b) “Joint-venture business” means a cannabis-related
business operated pursuant to a joint-venture agreement entered
into pursuant to subsection 1.
(c) “Officer” means a natural person who:
(1) Is proposed to hold the title of, or be designated by a
proposed joint-venture business as, a president, vice president,
secretary, treasurer, manager, chief executive officer, chief
operating officer or chief financial officer of the joint-venture
business; and
(2) May or may not be an owner of the proposed joint-
venture business.
(d) “Owner” means a natural person who is the holder of any
ownership interest in a proposed joint-venture business.
(e) “Social equity operator” means a person who:
(1) Does not hold a license; and
(2) Has been adversely affected by provisions of previous
laws which criminalized activity relating to cannabis, as
determined by the Board in accordance with the regulations
adopted pursuant to this section. Such adverse effects may
include, without limitation, adverse effects on an owner or officer
of the proposed joint-venture business.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 9 –
Sec. 6. NRS 678B.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.210 1. [A] Except as otherwise provided in section 5
of this act, a person shall not engage in the business of a medical
cannabis establishment unless the person holds a medical cannabis
establishment license issued by the Board pursuant to this section.
2. A person who wishes to engage in the business of a medical
cannabis establishment must submit to the Board an application on a
form prescribed by the Board.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678B.215 to
678B.240, inclusive, not later than 90 days after receiving an
application to engage in the business of a medical cannabis
establishment, the Board shall register the medical cannabis
establishment and issue a medical cannabis establishment license
and a random 20-digit alphanumeric identification number if:
(a) The person who wishes to operate the proposed medical
cannabis establishment has submitted to the Board all of the
following:
(1) The application fee, as set forth in NRS 678B.390;
(2) An application, which must include:
(I) The legal name of the proposed medical cannabis
establishment;
(II) The physical address where the proposed medical
cannabis establishment will be located and the physical address of
any co-owned additional or otherwise associated medical cannabis
establishments, the locations of which may not be on the property of
an airport, within 1,000 feet of a public or private school that
provides formal education traditionally associated with preschool or
kindergarten through grade 12 and that existed on the date on which
the application for the proposed medical cannabis establishment was
submitted to the Board, within 300 feet of a community facility that
existed on the date on which the application for the proposed
medical cannabis establishment was submitted to the Board or, if the
proposed medical cannabis establishment will be located in a county
whose population is 100,000 or more, within 1,500 feet of an
establishment that holds a nonrestricted gaming license described in
subsection 1 or 2 of NRS 463.0177 and that existed on the date on
which the application for the proposed medical cannabis
establishment was submitted to the Board;
(III) Evidence that the applicant controls not less than
$250,000 in liquid assets to cover the initial expenses of opening the
proposed medical cannabis establishment and complying with the
provisions of this title;
(IV) Evidence that the applicant owns the property on
which the proposed medical cannabis establishment will be located
-
*AB203_R1*

– 10 –
or has the written permission of the property owner to operate the
proposed medical cannabis establishment on that property;
(V) For the applicant and each person who is proposed to
be an owner, officer or board member of the proposed medical
cannabis establishment, a complete set of the person’s fingerprints
and written permission of the person authorizing the Board to
forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for its report; and
(VI) The name, address and date of birth of each person
who is proposed to be an owner, officer or board member of the
proposed medical cannabis establishment;
(3) Operating procedures consistent with rules of the Board
for oversight of the proposed medical cannabis establishment,
including, without limitation:
(I) Procedures to ensure the use of adequate security
measures; and
(II) The use of an electronic verification system and an
inventory control system pursuant to NRS 678C.420 and 678C.430;
(4) If the proposed medical cannabis establishment will sell
or deliver medical cannabis products, proposed operating
procedures for handling such products which must be preapproved
by the Board;
(5) If the city or county in which the proposed medical
cannabis establishment will be located has enacted zoning
restrictions, proof that the proposed location is in compliance with
those restrictions and satisfies all applicable building requirements;
and
(6) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678B.633, none of the
persons who are proposed to be owners, officers or board members
of the proposed medical cannabis establishment have been
convicted of an excluded felony offense;
(c) None of the persons who are proposed to be owners, officers
or board members of the proposed medical cannabis establishment
have:
(1) Served as an owner, officer or board member for a
cannabis establishment that has had its medical cannabis
establishment license or adult-use cannabis establishment license
revoked;
(2) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card revoked;
(3) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis executive revoked; or
-
*AB203_R1*

– 11 –
(4) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis receiver revoked; and
(d) None of the persons who are proposed to be owners, officers
or board members of the proposed medical cannabis establishment
are under 21 years of age.
4. For each person who submits an application pursuant to this
section, and each person who is proposed to be an owner, officer or
board member of a proposed medical cannabis establishment, the
Board shall submit the fingerprints of the person to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to determine the criminal
history of that person.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 and NRS
678B.215, if an application for registration as a medical cannabis
establishment satisfies the requirements of this section, is qualified
in the determination of the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.200 and
the establishment is not disqualified from being registered as a
medical cannabis establishment pursuant to this section or other
applicable law, the Board shall issue to the establishment a medical
cannabis establishment license. A medical cannabis establishment
license expires 1 year after the date of issuance and may be renewed
upon:
(a) Submission of the information required by the Board by
regulation; and
(b) Payment of the renewal fee set forth in NRS 678B.390.
6. In determining whether to issue a medical cannabis
establishment license pursuant to this section, the Board shall
consider the criteria of merit set forth in NRS 678B.240.
7. For the purposes of sub-subparagraph (II) of subparagraph
(2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 3, the distance must be measured
from the front door of the proposed medical cannabis establishment
to the closest point of the property line of a school, community
facility or gaming establishment.
8. As used in this section, “community facility” means:
(a) A facility that provides day care to children.
(b) A public park.
(c) A playground.
(d) A public swimming pool.
(e) A center or facility, the primary purpose of which is to
provide recreational opportunities or services to children or
adolescents.
(f) A church, synagogue or other building, structure or place
used for religious worship or other religious purpose.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 12 –
Sec. 7. NRS 678B.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.250 1. [A] Except as otherwise provided in section 5
of this act, a person shall not engage in the business of an adult-use
cannabis establishment unless the person holds an adult-use
cannabis establishment license issued pursuant to this section.
2. A person who wishes to engage in the business of an adult-
use cannabis establishment must submit to the Board an application
on a form prescribed by the Board.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678B.260, 678B.270,
678B.280, 678B.322 and 678B.324 to 678B.328, inclusive, the
Board shall issue an adult-use cannabis establishment license to an
applicant if:
(a) The person who wishes to operate the proposed adult-use
cannabis establishment has submitted to the Board all of the
following:
(1) The application fee, as set forth in NRS 678B.390;
(2) An application, which must include:
(I) The legal name of the proposed adult-use cannabis
establishment;
(II) The physical address where the proposed adult-use
cannabis establishment will be located and the physical address of
any co-owned additional or otherwise associated adult-use cannabis
establishments, the locations of which may not be on the property of
an airport, within 1,000 feet of a public or private school that
provides formal education traditionally associated with preschool or
kindergarten through grade 12 and that existed on the date on which
the application for the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment
was submitted to the Board, within 300 feet of a community facility
that existed on the date on which the application for the proposed
adult-use cannabis establishment was submitted to the Board or, if
the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment will be located in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more, within 1,500 feet of an
establishment that holds a nonrestricted gaming license described in
subsection 1 or 2 of NRS 463.0177 and that existed on the date on
which the application for the proposed adult-use cannabis
establishment was submitted to the Board;
(III) [Evidence] Except for a social equity applicant
applying for the issuance of an adult-use cannabis establishment
license for an independent cannabis consumption lounge,
evidence that the applicant controls liquid assets in an amount
determined by the Board to be sufficient to cover the initial
expenses of opening the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment
and complying with the provisions of this title;
(IV) Evidence that the applicant owns the property on
which the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment will be located
-
*AB203_R1*

– 13 –
or has the written permission of the property owner to operate the
proposed adult-use cannabis establishment on that property;
(V) For the applicant and each person who is proposed to
be an owner, officer or board member of the proposed adult-use
cannabis establishment, a complete set of the person’s fingerprints
and written permission of the person authorizing the Board to
forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for its report; and
(VI) The name, address and date of birth of each person
who is proposed to be an owner, officer or board member of the
proposed adult-use cannabis establishment;
(3) Operating procedures consistent with rules of the Board
for oversight of the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment,
including, without limitation:
(I) Procedures to ensure the use of adequate security
measures; and
(II) The use of an inventory control system;
(4) If the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment will sell
or deliver adult-use cannabis products, proposed operating
procedures for handling such products which must be preapproved
by the Board; and
(5) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678B.633, none of the
persons who are proposed to be owners, officers or board members
of the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment have been
convicted of an excluded felony offense;
(c) None of the persons who are proposed to be owners, officers
or board members of the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment
have:
(1) Served as an owner, officer or board member for a
cannabis establishment that has had its adult-use cannabis
establishment license or medical cannabis establishment license
revoked;
(2) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card revoked;
(3) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis executive revoked; or
(4) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis receiver revoked; and
(d) None of the persons who are proposed to be owners, officers
or board members of the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment
are under 21 years of age.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 14 –
4. For each person who submits an application pursuant to this
section, and each person who is proposed to be an owner, officer or
board member of a proposed adult-use cannabis establishment, the
Board shall submit the fingerprints of the person to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to determine the criminal
history of that person.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if an applicant
for licensure to operate an adult-use cannabis establishment satisfies
the requirements of this section, is qualified in the determination of
the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.200 and is not disqualified from
being licensed pursuant to this section or other applicable law, the
Board shall issue to the applicant an adult-use cannabis
establishment license. An adult-use cannabis establishment license
expires 1 year after the date of issuance and may be renewed upon:
(a) Submission of the information required by the Board by
regulation; and
(b) Payment of the renewal fee set forth in NRS 678B.390.
6. In determining whether to issue an adult-use cannabis
license pursuant to this section, the Board shall consider the criteria
of merit and scoring guidelines set forth in NRS 678B.280 or
678B.324, as applicable.
7. For the purposes of sub-subparagraph (II) of subparagraph
(2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 3, the distance must be measured
from the front door of the proposed adult-use cannabis
establishment to the closest point of the property line of a school,
community facility or gaming establishment.
8. As used in this section, “community facility” means:
(a) A facility that provides day care to children.
(b) A public park.
(c) A playground.
(d) A public swimming pool.
(e) A center or facility, the primary purpose of which is to
provide recreational opportunities or services to children or
adolescents.
(f) A church, synagogue or other building, structure or place
used for religious worship or other religious purpose.
Sec. 8. NRS 678B.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.380 1. Except as otherwise provided by regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection 2, the following are
nontransferable:
(a) A cannabis establishment agent registration card.
(b) A cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis executive.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 15 –
(c) A cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis receiver.
(d) A medical cannabis establishment license.
(e) An adult-use cannabis establishment license.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations which prescribe
procedures and requirements by which a holder of:
(a) A license may transfer the license to another party who is
qualified to hold such a license pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter.
(b) An ownership interest in a cannabis establishment may
transfer all or any portion of the ownership interest to another party
who is qualified to hold an ownership interest in a cannabis
establishment pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
3. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 2 may give
priority in the processing of transfers of licenses to a transfer in
which the transferor is:
(a) Subject to a receivership;
(b) Involved in a recapitalization; or
(c) A party to a court proceeding involving financial distress.
[4. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 2 must:
(a) Prohibit the holder of an adult-use cannabis establishment
license for an independent cannabis consumption lounge from
transferring the license until at least 2 years from the date on which
the independent cannabis consumption lounge for which the license
was issued became operational;
(b) Require the holder of an adult-use cannabis establishment
license for an independent cannabis consumption lounge who
wishes to cease operations before the independent cannabis
consumption lounge for which the license was issued has been
operational for at least 2 years to surrender the license to the Board;
and
(c) Require the Board to hold a license surrendered pursuant to
paragraph (b) in reserve for issuance to an applicant for such a
license in the future.]
Sec. 9. NRS 678B.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.520 1. Each cannabis establishment shall, in
consultation with the Board, cooperate to ensure that all cannabis
products offered for sale:
(a) Are labeled clearly and unambiguously:
(1) As cannabis with the words “THIS PRODUCT
CONTAINS CANNABIS” in bold type . [; and] The provisions of
this subparagraph do not apply if those words in bold type are
included on the packaging of the cannabis product.
(2) As required by the provisions of this chapter and chapters
678C and 678D of NRS.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 16 –
(b) Are not presented in packaging that contains an image of a
cartoon character, mascot, action figure, balloon or toy, except that
such an item may appear in the logo of the cannabis production
facility which produced the product.
(c) Are regulated and sold on the basis of the concentration of
THC in the products and not by weight.
(d) Are packaged and labeled in such a manner as to allow
tracking by way of an inventory control system.
(e) Are not packaged and labeled in a manner which is modeled
after a brand of products primarily consumed by or marketed to
children.
(f) Are labeled in a manner or presented in packaging which
indicates the amount of THC in the product, measured in
milligrams, and includes a statement that the product contains
cannabis and its potency was tested with an allowable variance of
the amount determined by the Board by regulation.
(g) Are not labeled or marketed as candy.
(h) Are labeled with [:] or presented in packaging that
includes:
(1) The words “Keep out of reach of children”;
(2) A list of all ingredients used in the cannabis product;
(3) A list of all major food allergens in the cannabis product;
and
(4) Any other information the Board may require by
regulation.
2. A cannabis production facility shall not produce cannabis
products in any form that:
(a) Is or appears to be a lollipop.
(b) Bears the likeness or contains characteristics of a real or
fictional person, animal or fruit, including, without limitation, a
caricature, cartoon or artistic rendering.
(c) Is modeled after a brand of products primarily consumed by
or marketed to children.
(d) Is made by applying concentrated cannabis, as defined in
NRS 453.042, to a commercially available candy or snack food item
other than dried fruit, nuts or granola.
3. A cannabis production facility shall:
(a) Seal any cannabis product that consists of cookies or
brownies in a bag or other container which is not transparent.
(b) Maintain a hand washing area with hot water, soap and
disposable towels which is located away from any area in which
cannabis products are cooked or otherwise prepared.
(c) Require each person who handles cannabis products to
restrain his or her hair, wear clean clothing and keep his or her
fingernails neatly trimmed.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 17 –
(d) Package all cannabis products produced by the cannabis
production facility on the premises of the cannabis production
facility.
4. A cannabis establishment shall not engage in advertising that
in any way makes cannabis or cannabis products appeal to children,
including, without limitation, advertising which uses an image of a
cartoon character, mascot, action figure, balloon, fruit or toy.
5. Each cannabis sales facility shall offer for sale containers for
the storage of cannabis and cannabis products which lock and are
designed to prohibit children from unlocking and opening the
container.
6. A cannabis sales facility shall:
(a) Convey to each purchaser of cannabis or cannabis products
the following information in a manner prescribed by the Board:
(1) To keep cannabis and cannabis products out of the reach
of children;
(2) That cannabis products can cause severe illness in
children;
(3) That allowing children to ingest cannabis or cannabis
products or storing cannabis or cannabis products in a location
which is accessible to children may result in an investigation by an
agency which provides child welfare services or criminal
prosecution for child abuse or neglect;
(4) That the intoxicating effects of edible cannabis products
may be delayed by 2 hours or more and users of edible cannabis
products should initially ingest a small amount of the product, then
wait at least 120 minutes before ingesting any additional amount of
the product;
(5) That pregnant women should consult with a physician
before ingesting cannabis or cannabis products;
(6) That ingesting cannabis or cannabis products with
alcohol or other drugs, including prescription medication, may result
in unpredictable levels of impairment and that a person should
consult with a physician before doing so;
(7) That cannabis or cannabis products can impair
concentration, coordination and judgment and a person should not
operate a motor vehicle while under the influence of cannabis or
cannabis products; and
(8) That ingestion of any amount of cannabis or cannabis
products before driving may result in criminal prosecution for
driving under the influence.
(b) Enclose all cannabis and cannabis products in opaque, child-
resistant packaging upon sale.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 18 –
7. A cannabis sales facility shall allow any person who is at
least 21 years of age to enter the premises of the cannabis sales
facility.
8. If the health authority, as defined in NRS 446.050, where a
cannabis production facility, cannabis sales facility or cannabis
consumption lounge which sells edible cannabis products is located
requires persons who handle food at a food establishment to obtain
certification, the cannabis production facility, cannabis sales facility
or cannabis consumption lounge shall ensure that at least one
employee maintains such certification.
9. A cannabis production facility may sell a commodity or
product made using hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, or containing
cannabidiol to a cannabis sales facility.
10. In addition to any other product authorized by the
provisions of this title, a cannabis sales facility may sell:
(a) Any commodity or product made using hemp, as defined in
NRS 557.160;
(b) Any commodity or product containing cannabidiol with a
THC concentration of not more than 0.3 percent; and
(c) Any other product specified by regulation of the Board.
11. A cannabis establishment:
(a) Shall not engage in advertising which contains any statement
or illustration that:
(1) Is false or misleading;
(2) Promotes overconsumption of cannabis or cannabis
products;
(3) Depicts the actual consumption of cannabis or cannabis
products; or
(4) Depicts a child or other person who is less than 21 years
of age consuming cannabis or cannabis products or objects
suggesting the presence of a child, including, without limitation,
toys, characters or cartoons, or contains any other depiction which is
designed in any manner to be appealing to or encourage
consumption of cannabis or cannabis products by a person who is
less than 21 years of age.
(b) Shall not advertise in any publication or on radio, television
or any other medium if 30 percent or more of the audience of that
medium is reasonably expected to be persons who are less than 21
years of age.
(c) Shall not place an advertisement:
(1) Within 1,000 feet of a public or private school,
playground, public park or library, but may maintain such an
advertisement if it was initially placed before the school,
playground, public park or library was located within 1,000 feet of
the location of the advertisement;
-
*AB203_R1*

– 19 –
(2) On or inside of a motor vehicle used for public
transportation or any shelter for public transportation;
(3) At a sports event to which persons who are less than 21
years of age are allowed entry; or
(4) At an entertainment event if it is reasonably estimated
that 30 percent or more of the persons who will attend that event are
less than 21 years of age.
(d) Shall not advertise or offer any cannabis or cannabis product
as “free” or “donated” without a purchase.
(e) Shall ensure that all advertising by the cannabis
establishment contains such warnings as may be prescribed by the
Board, which must include, without limitation, the following words:
(1) “Keep out of reach of children”; and
(2) “For use only by adults 21 years of age and older.”
(f) Shall ensure that all advertising by the cannabis
establishment contains:
(1) The name of the cannabis establishment; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 12, the adult-
use cannabis establishment license number or medical cannabis
establishment license number of the cannabis establishment or any
other unique identifier assigned to the cannabis establishment by the
Board.
12. A cannabis establishment that holds more than one license
may satisfy the requirement set forth in subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (f) of subsection 11 if the cannabis establishment includes
in all advertising conducted by the cannabis establishment:
(a) Any one of the adult-use cannabis establishment license
numbers or medical cannabis establishment license numbers of the
cannabis establishment; or
(b) Any one unique identifier assigned to the cannabis
establishment by the Board.
13. Nothing in subsection 11 shall be construed to prohibit a
local government, pursuant to chapter 244, 268 or 278 of NRS, from
adopting an ordinance for the regulation of advertising relating to
cannabis which is more restrictive than the provisions of subsection
11 relating to:
(a) The number, location and size of signs, including, without
limitation, any signs carried or displayed by a natural person;
(b) Handbills, pamphlets, cards or other types of advertisements
that are distributed, excluding an advertisement placed in a
newspaper of general circulation, trade publication or other form of
print media;
(c) Any stationary or moving display that is located on or near
the premises of a cannabis establishment; and
-
*AB203_R1*

– 20 –
(d) The content of any advertisement used by a cannabis
establishment if the ordinance sets forth specific prohibited content
for such an advertisement.
14. If a cannabis establishment engages in advertising for
which it is required to determine the percentage of persons who are
less than 21 years of age and who may reasonably be expected to
view or hear the advertisement, the cannabis establishment shall
maintain documentation for not less than 5 years after the date on
which the advertisement is first broadcasted, published or otherwise
displayed that demonstrates the manner in which the cannabis
establishment determined the reasonably expected age of the
audience for that advertisement.
15. To the extent that they are inconsistent or otherwise
conflict with the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS
678D.480, the requirements of this section pertaining to cannabis
products do not apply to ready-to-consume cannabis products
prepared and sold by a cannabis consumption lounge.
16. In addition to any other penalties provided for by law, the
Board may impose a civil penalty upon a cannabis establishment
that violates the provisions of subsection 11 or 14 as follows:
(a) For the first violation in the immediately preceding 2 years, a
civil penalty not to exceed $1,250.
(b) For the second violation in the immediately preceding 2
years, a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500.
(c) For the third violation in the immediately preceding 2 years,
a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.
(d) For the fourth violation in the immediately preceding 2
years, a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.
17. As used in this section, “motor vehicle used for public
transportation” does not include a taxicab, as defined in
NRS 706.124.
Sec. 10. NRS 678B.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.650 1. The Board shall adopt such regulations as it
determines to be necessary or advisable to carry out the provisions
of this chapter. Such regulations are in addition to any requirements
set forth in statute and must, without limitation:
[1.] (a) Prescribe the form and any additional required content
of applications for licenses or registration cards issued pursuant to
this chapter;
[2.] (b) Establish procedures for the suspension or revocation of
a license or registration card or other disciplinary action to be taken
against a licensee or registrant;
[3.] (c) Set forth rules pertaining to the safe and healthful
operation of cannabis establishments, including, without limitation:
-
*AB203_R1*

– 21 –
[(a)] (1) The manner of protecting against diversion and
theft without imposing an undue burden on cannabis establishments
or compromising the confidentiality of consumers and holders of
registry identification cards and letters of approval, as those terms
are defined in NRS 678C.080 and 678C.070, respectively;
[(b)] (2) Minimum requirements for the oversight of
cannabis establishments;
[(c)] (3) Minimum requirements for the keeping of records
by cannabis establishments;
[(d)] (4) Provisions for the security of cannabis
establishments, including, without limitation, requirements for the
protection by a fully operational security alarm system of each
cannabis establishment; and
[(e)] (5) Procedures pursuant to which cannabis
establishments must use the services of cannabis independent testing
laboratories to ensure that any cannabis or cannabis product or
commodity or product made from hemp, as defined in NRS
557.160, sold by a cannabis sales facility to an end user is tested for
content, quality and potency in accordance with standards
established by the Board;
[4.] (d) Establish circumstances and procedures pursuant to
which the maximum fees set forth in NRS 678B.390 may be
reduced over time to ensure that the fees imposed pursuant to NRS
678B.390 are, insofar as may be practicable, revenue neutral;
[5.] (e) Establish different categories of cannabis establishment
agent registration cards, including, without limitation, criteria for
issuance of a cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis executive and a cannabis establishment agent registration
card for a cannabis receiver and criteria for training and
certification, for each of the different types of cannabis
establishments at which such an agent may be employed or
volunteer or provide labor as a cannabis establishment agent;
[6.] (f) As far as possible while maintaining accountability,
protect the identity and personal identifying information of each
person who receives, facilitates or delivers services in accordance
with this chapter;
[7.] (g) Establish procedures and requirements to enable a dual
licensee to operate a medical cannabis establishment and an adult-
use cannabis establishment at the same location;
[8.] (h) Determine whether any provision of this chapter or
chapter 678C or 678D of NRS would make the operation of a
cannabis establishment by a dual licensee unreasonably
impracticable;
-
*AB203_R1*

– 22 –
[9.] (i) Allow for any record relating to the delivery of cannabis
or cannabis products that is required to be kept by a cannabis
establishment to be created and maintained in an electronic format;
[10.] (j) Prescribe the manner in which the Board will
determine whether a person who holds an adult-use cannabis
establishment license is ineligible to hold additional licenses
pursuant to NRS 678B.325 and 678B.328;
[11.] (k) Set forth rules pertaining to the safe and healthful
operation of cannabis consumption lounges, including, without
limitation:
[(a)] (1) Standards for the air quality in a cannabis
consumption lounge;
[(b)] (2) Procedures and requirements for the collection and
disposal of cannabis and cannabis products which are left at a
cannabis consumption lounge; and
[(c)] (3) Requirements for the training of employees of a
cannabis consumption lounge in the sale and safe consumption of
single-use cannabis products and ready-to-consume cannabis
products; and
[12.] (l) Address such other matters as the Board deems
necessary to carry out the provisions of this title.
2. The regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to
subsection 1 must:
(a) Not require a cannabis sales facility to maintain a visitor’s
log.
(b) Not require a cannabis establishment to maintain records
concerning sales transactions for more than 3 years.
(c) If the Board requires a cannabis establishment to conduct
a quarterly inventory, allow any agent of the cannabis
establishment who is not involved in the regular management of
the inventory of the cannabis establishment to conduct the
quarterly inventory.
3. For the purposes of paragraph (c) of subsection 2, an
agent of a cannabis establishment is involved in the regular
management of the inventory of the cannabis establishment if the
agent satisfies all of the following:
(a) The agent is responsible for the oversight of inventory of
the cannabis establishment;
(b) The agent has been designated as an inventory agent in
any computer software used for the seed-to-sale tracking of
cannabis and cannabis products adopted by the Board; and
(c) The agent performs daily or routine tasks related to the
inventory of the cannabis establishment in the inventory control
system of the cannabis establishment.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 23 –
Sec. 11. NRS 678C.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.100 1. “Usable cannabis” means [:
(a) The] the dried leaves and flowers of a plant of the genus
Cannabis, and any mixture or preparation thereof, that are
appropriate for the medical use of cannabis or the adult use of
cannabis . [; and
(b) The seeds of a plant of the genus Cannabis.]
2. The term does not include the seeds, stalks and roots of the
plant.
Sec. 12. NRS 678C.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 678C.300, a person who holds a valid registry identification
card issued to the person pursuant to NRS 678C.230 or 678C.270 is
exempt from state prosecution for:
(a) The possession, delivery or production of cannabis;
(b) The possession or delivery of paraphernalia;
(c) Aiding and abetting another in the possession, delivery or
production of cannabis;
(d) Aiding and abetting another in the possession or delivery of
paraphernalia;
(e) Any combination of the acts described in paragraphs (a) to
(d), inclusive; and
(f) Any other criminal offense in which the possession, delivery
or production of cannabis or the possession or delivery of
paraphernalia is an element.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsections 1 and 5, no
person may be subject to state prosecution for constructive
possession, conspiracy or any other criminal offense solely for being
in the presence or vicinity of the medical use of cannabis in
accordance with the provisions of this title.
3. The exemption from state prosecution set forth in subsection
1 applies only to the extent that a person who holds a registry
identification card issued to the person pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 678C.230 and the designated primary
caregiver, if any, of such a person:
(a) Engage in or assist in, as applicable, the medical use of
cannabis in accordance with the provisions of this title as justified to
mitigate the symptoms or effects of a person’s chronic or
debilitating medical condition; and
(b) Do not, at any one time, collectively possess with another
who is authorized to possess, deliver or produce more than:
(1) Two and one-half ounces of usable cannabis;
(2) Twelve cannabis plants, irrespective of whether the
cannabis plants are mature or immature; and
-
*AB203_R1*

– 24 –
(3) A maximum allowable quantity of cannabis products as
established by regulation of the Board.
 The persons described in this subsection must ensure that the
usable cannabis and cannabis plants described in this subsection are
safeguarded in an enclosed, secure location.
4. If the persons described in subsection 3 possess, deliver or
produce cannabis in an amount which exceeds the amount described
in paragraph (b) of that subsection, those persons:
(a) Are not exempt from state prosecution for the possession,
delivery or production of cannabis.
(b) May establish an affirmative defense to charges of the
possession, delivery or production of cannabis, or any combination
of those acts, in the manner set forth in NRS 678C.310.
5. A person who holds a valid medical cannabis establishment
license issued to the person pursuant to NRS 678B.210, a valid
cannabis establishment agent registration card issued to the person
pursuant to NRS 678B.340, a valid cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis executive issued pursuant to NRS
678B.350 or a valid cannabis establishment agent registration card
for a cannabis receiver issued pursuant to NRS 678B.355 , or who
has entered into a joint-venture agreement approved by the Board
pursuant to section 5 of this act, and who confines his or her
activities to those authorized by this title, and the regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant thereto, is exempt from state
prosecution for:
(a) The possession, delivery or production of cannabis;
(b) The possession or delivery of paraphernalia;
(c) Aiding and abetting another in the possession, delivery or
production of cannabis;
(d) Aiding and abetting another in the possession or delivery of
paraphernalia;
(e) Any combination of the acts described in paragraphs (a) to
(d), inclusive; and
(f) Any other criminal offense in which the possession, delivery
or production of cannabis or the possession or delivery of
paraphernalia is an element.
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, after a medical cannabis
dispensary opens in the county of residence of a person who holds a
registry identification card, including, without limitation, a
designated primary caregiver, such a person is not authorized to
cultivate, grow or produce cannabis. The provisions of this
subsection do not apply if:
-
*AB203_R1*

– 25 –
(a) The person who holds the registry identification card was
cultivating, growing or producing cannabis in accordance with state
law on or before July 1, 2013;
(b) All the medical cannabis dispensaries in the county of
residence of the person who holds the registry identification card
close or are unable to supply the quantity or strain of cannabis
necessary for the medical use of the person to treat his or her
specific medical condition;
(c) Because of illness or lack of transportation, the person who
holds the registry identification card is unable reasonably to travel to
a medical cannabis dispensary; or
(d) No medical cannabis dispensary was operating within 25
miles of the residence of the person who holds the registry
identification card at the time the person first applied for his or her
registry identification card.
7. As used in this section, “cannabis” includes, without
limitation, cannabis products.
Sec. 13. NRS 678C.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.400 1. Each medical cannabis establishment must:
(a) Be located in a separate building or facility that is located in
a commercial or industrial zone or overlay;
(b) Have an appearance, both as to the interior and exterior, that
is professional, orderly, dignified and consistent with the traditional
style of pharmacies and medical offices; and
(c) Have discreet and professional signage that is consistent with
the traditional style of signage for pharmacies and medical offices.
2. If a medical cannabis establishment is operated by a dual
licensee, any provision of this section which is determined by the
Board to be unreasonably impracticable pursuant to paragraph (h)
of subsection [8] 1 of NRS 678B.650 does not apply to the medical
cannabis establishment.
Sec. 14. NRS 678C.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.410 1. A medical cannabis establishment is prohibited
from acquiring, possessing, cultivating, manufacturing, delivering,
transferring, transporting, supplying or dispensing cannabis for any
purpose except to:
(a) Directly or indirectly assist patients who possess valid
registry identification cards;
(b) Assist patients who possess valid registry identification cards
or letters of approval by way of those patients’ designated primary
caregivers; and
(c) Return for a refund cannabis, medical edible cannabis
products or medical cannabis-infused products to the medical
cannabis establishment from which the cannabis, medical edible
-
*AB203_R1*

– 26 –
cannabis products or medical cannabis-infused products were
acquired.
 For the purposes of this subsection, a person shall be deemed to
be a patient who possesses a valid registry identification card or
letter of approval if he or she qualifies for nonresident reciprocity
pursuant to NRS 678C.470.
2. A medical cannabis dispensary and a medical cultivation
facility may acquire usable cannabis or cannabis plants from a
person who holds a valid registry identification card, including,
without limitation, a designated primary caregiver. Except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, the patient or caregiver, as
applicable, must receive no compensation for the cannabis. A
patient who holds a valid registry identification card, and the
designated primary caregiver of such a patient, or the designated
primary caregiver of a person who holds a letter of approval may
sell usable cannabis to a medical cannabis dispensary one time and
may sell cannabis plants to a cultivation facility one time.
3. A medical cannabis production facility and a medical
cannabis dispensary may acquire hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160,
or a commodity or product made using such hemp from a grower or
handler registered by the State Department of Agriculture pursuant
to chapter 557 of NRS. A medical cannabis production facility may
use hemp or a commodity or product made using such hemp to
manufacture medical cannabis products. A medical cannabis
dispensary may dispense hemp or a commodity or product made
using such hemp and medical edible cannabis products and medical
cannabis-infused products manufactured using hemp or a
commodity or product made using such hemp.
4. A dual licensee:
(a) Shall comply with the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to paragraph (g) of subsection [7] 1 of NRS 678B.650
with respect to the medical cannabis establishment operated by the
dual licensee; and
(b) May, to the extent authorized by such regulations, combine
the location or operations of the medical cannabis establishment
operated by the dual licensee with the adult-use cannabis
establishment operated by the dual licensee.
5. If a medical cannabis establishment is operated by a dual
licensee, any provision of this section which is determined by the
Board to be unreasonably impracticable pursuant to paragraph (h)
of subsection [8] 1 of NRS 678B.650 does not apply to the medical
cannabis establishment.
Sec. 15. NRS 678C.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.440 1. Each medical cannabis dispensary shall ensure
all of the following:
-
*AB203_R1*

– 27 –
(a) The weight, concentration and content of THC in all
cannabis and cannabis products that the dispensary sells is clearly
and accurately stated on the product sold.
(b) That, posted clearly and conspicuously within the
dispensary, are the legal limits on the possession of cannabis for
medical purposes, as set forth in NRS 678C.200.
(c) That, posted clearly and conspicuously within the
dispensary, is a sign stating unambiguously the legal limits on the
possession of cannabis for medical purposes, as set forth in
NRS 678C.200.
(d) That only persons who are at least 21 years of age or hold a
registry identification card or letter of approval are allowed to enter
the premises of the medical cannabis dispensary.
2. A medical cannabis dispensary may, but is not required to,
track the purchases of cannabis for medical purposes by any person
to ensure that the person does not exceed the legal limits on the
possession of cannabis for medical purposes, as set forth in NRS
678C.200. The Board shall not adopt a regulation or in any other
way require a medical cannabis dispensary to track the purchases of
a person or determine whether the person has exceeded the legal
limits on the possession of cannabis for medical purposes, as set
forth in NRS 678C.200.
3. A medical cannabis dispensary which is a dual licensee may,
to the extent authorized by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to paragraph (g) of subsection [7] 1 of NRS 678B.650,
allow any person who is at least 21 years of age to enter the
premises of the medical cannabis dispensary, regardless of whether
such a person holds a valid registry identification card or letter of
approval.
4. A medical cannabis dispensary shall not sell cannabis or
cannabis products to a consumer through the use of, or accept a sale
of cannabis or cannabis products from, a third party, intermediary
business, broker or any other business that does not hold a medical
cannabis establishment license for a medical cannabis dispensary.
5. A medical cannabis dispensary may contract with a third
party or intermediary business to deliver cannabis or medical
cannabis products to consumers only if:
(a) Every sale of cannabis or cannabis products which is
delivered by the third party or intermediary business is made
directly from the medical cannabis dispensary or an Internet
website, digital network or software application service of the
medical cannabis dispensary;
(b) The third party or intermediary business does not advertise
that it sells, offers to sell or appears to sell cannabis or cannabis
-
*AB203_R1*

– 28 –
products or allows the submission of an order for cannabis or
cannabis products; and
(c) The delivery complies with the requirements of
NRS 678C.450.
Sec. 16. NRS 678C.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.600 1. The fact that a person possesses a registry
identification card or letter of approval issued to the person by the
Division or its designee pursuant to NRS 678C.230 or 678C.270, a
medical cannabis establishment license issued to the person by the
Board or its designee pursuant to NRS 678B.210, a cannabis
establishment agent registration card issued to the person by the
Board or its designee pursuant to NRS 678B.340, a cannabis
establishment agent registration card for a cannabis executive issued
to the person by the Board or its designee pursuant to NRS
678B.350 or a cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis receiver issued to the person by the Board pursuant to NRS
678B.355 or has entered into a joint-venture agreement approved
by the Board pursuant to section 5 of this act does not, alone:
(a) Constitute probable cause to search the person or the
person’s property; or
(b) Subject the person or the person’s property to inspection by
any governmental agency.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if officers
of a state or local law enforcement agency seize cannabis,
paraphernalia or other related property from a person engaged in,
facilitating or assisting in the medical use of cannabis:
(a) The law enforcement agency shall ensure that the cannabis,
paraphernalia or other related property is not destroyed while in the
possession of the law enforcement agency.
(b) Any property interest of the person from whom the cannabis,
paraphernalia or other related property was seized must not be
forfeited pursuant to any provision of law providing for the
forfeiture of property, except as part of a sentence imposed after
conviction of a criminal offense.
(c) Upon:
(1) A decision not to prosecute;
(2) The dismissal of charges; or
(3) Acquittal,
 the law enforcement agency shall, to the extent permitted by law,
return to that person any usable cannabis, cannabis plants,
paraphernalia or other related property that was seized. The
provisions of this subsection do not require a law enforcement
agency to care for live cannabis plants.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 29 –
Sec. 17. NRS 678D.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678D.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
678D.300, a person who is 21 years of age or older is exempt from
state prosecution for:
(a) The possession, delivery or production of cannabis;
(b) The possession or delivery of paraphernalia;
(c) Aiding and abetting another in the possession, delivery or
production of cannabis;
(d) Aiding and abetting another in the possession or delivery of
paraphernalia;
(e) Any combination of the acts described in paragraphs (a) to
(d), inclusive; and
(f) Any other criminal offense in which the possession, delivery
or production of cannabis or the possession or delivery of
paraphernalia is an element.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsections 1 and 5, no
person may be subject to state prosecution for constructive
possession, conspiracy or any other criminal offense solely for being
in the presence or vicinity of the adult use of cannabis in accordance
with the provisions of this title.
3. The exemption from state prosecution set forth in subsection
1 applies only to the extent that a person:
(a) Is 21 years of age or older;
(b) Is not employed by any agency or political subdivision of
this State in a position which requires the person to be certified by
the Peace Officers’ Standards and Training Commission;
(c) Engages in the adult use of cannabis in accordance with the
provisions of this title;
(d) Does not, at any one time, possess, deliver or produce more
than:
(1) Two and one-half ounces of usable cannabis;
(2) One-fourth of an ounce of concentrated cannabis;
(3) Six cannabis plants, irrespective of whether the cannabis
plants are mature or immature; and
(4) A maximum allowable quantity of adult-use cannabis
products as established by regulation of the Board;
(e) Cultivates, grows or produces not more than six cannabis
plants:
(1) Within an enclosed area that is not exposed to public
view that is equipped with locks or other security devices which
allow access only by an authorized person; and
(2) At a residence or upon the grounds of a residence in
which not more than 12 cannabis plants are cultivated, grown or
produced;
-
*AB203_R1*

– 30 –
(f) Delivers 2.5 ounces or less of usable cannabis or one-fourth
of an ounce or less of concentrated cannabis without remuneration
to a person who is 21 years of age or older so long as such delivery
is not advertised or promoted to the public; and
(g) Assists another person who is 21 years of age or older in
carrying out any of the acts described in paragraphs (a) to (f),
inclusive.
4. If a person possesses, uses or produces cannabis in an
amount which exceeds the amount set forth in paragraph (d) of
subsection 3 or in any manner other than that set forth in subsection
3, the person is not exempt from state prosecution for the
possession, delivery or production of cannabis.
5. A person who holds an adult-use cannabis establishment
license issued to the person pursuant to NRS 678B.250, a cannabis
establishment agent registration card issued to the person pursuant
to NRS 678B.340, a cannabis establishment agent registration card
for a cannabis executive issued to the person pursuant to NRS
678B.350 or a cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis receiver issued to the person pursuant to NRS 678B.355,
or who has entered into a joint-venture agreement approved by the
Board pursuant to section 5 of this act, and confines his or her
activities to those authorized by this title, and the regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant thereto, is exempt from state
prosecution for:
(a) The possession, delivery or production of cannabis;
(b) The possession or delivery of paraphernalia;
(c) Aiding and abetting another in the possession, delivery or
production of cannabis;
(d) Aiding and abetting another in the possession or delivery of
paraphernalia;
(e) Any combination of the acts described in paragraphs (a) to
(d), inclusive; and
(f) Any other criminal offense in which the possession, delivery
or production of cannabis or the possession or delivery of
paraphernalia is an element.
6. The commission of any act by a person for which the person
is exempt from state prosecution pursuant to this section must not be
used as the basis for the seizure or forfeiture of any property of the
person or for the imposition of a civil penalty.
Sec. 18. NRS 52.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
52.400 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678C.800:
[1.] (a) At any time after a substance which is alleged to be
marijuana is seized from a defendant by a peace officer, the law
enforcement agency of which the officer is a member may, without
the prior approval of the district court in the county in which the
-
*AB203_R1*

– 31 –
defendant is charged, destroy any amount of the substance that
exceeds 10 pounds.
[2.] (b) The law enforcement agency must, before destroying
the substance pursuant to this section:
[(a)] (1) Accurately weigh and record the weight of the
substance.
[(b)] (2) Take and retain, for evidentiary purposes, at least
five random and representative samples of the substance in addition
to the amount which is not authorized to be destroyed pursuant to
[subsection 1.] paragraph (a). If the substance is alleged to consist
of growing or harvested marijuana plants, the 10 pounds retained
pursuant to [subsection 1] paragraph (a) may include stalks,
branches, leaves and buds, but the five representative samples must
consist of only leaves or buds.
[(c)] (3) Take photographs that reasonably demonstrate the
total amount of the substance. A sign which clearly and
conspicuously shows the title or the case number of the matter,
proceeding or action to which the substance relates must appear next
to the substance in any photograph taken.
[3.] (c) A law enforcement agency that destroys a substance
pursuant to this section shall, not later than 30 days after the
destruction of the substance, file an affidavit in the court which has
jurisdiction over the pending criminal proceedings, if any,
pertaining to that substance. The affidavit must establish that the law
enforcement agency has complied with the requirements of
[subsection 2,] paragraph (b), specify the date and time of the
destruction of the substance and provide the publicly known address
of the agency. If there are no criminal proceedings pending which
pertain to the substance, the affidavit may be filed in any court
within the county which would have jurisdiction over a person
against whom such criminal charges might be filed.
[4.] (d) If the substance is finally determined not to be
marijuana, the owner may file a claim against the county to recover
the reasonable value of the property destroyed pursuant to this
section.
[5.] (e) The law enforcement agency’s finding as to the weight
of any substance alleged to be marijuana and destroyed pursuant to
this section is admissible in any subsequent proceeding arising out
of the same transaction.
2. As used in this section, “law enforcement agency”
includes, without limitation, the Cannabis Compliance Board.
Sec. 19. Chapter 372 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The provisions of this chapter relating to the imposition,
collection and remittance of the sales tax apply to a retailer who
-
*AB203_R1*

– 32 –
makes a retail sale of cannabis or cannabis products regardless of
whether the retailer holds a license issued pursuant to title 56 of
NRS.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cannabis” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.085.
(b) “Cannabis product” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.120.
Sec. 20. Chapter 372A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, the
Department may impose on any person who does not hold a
license pursuant to title 56 of NRS and who sells cannabis or a
cannabis product an administrative fine in the amount of the
excise tax on cannabis for which the person who engaged in the
sale of cannabis or a cannabis product would have been liable had
the person engaged in the sale as an adult-use cannabis
cultivation facility, for a sale for the purpose of resale, or adult-
use cannabis retail store, for a sale for the purpose of use or
consumption.
2. As used in this section, “cannabis product” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 678A.120.
Sec. 21. NRS 372A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
372A.200 As used in NRS 372A.200 to 372A.380, inclusive,
and section 20 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 372A.205 to 372A.250, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 22. NRS 372A.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
372A.260 The provisions of chapter 360 of NRS relating to the
payment, collection, administration and enforcement of taxes,
including, without limitation, any provisions relating to the
imposition of penalties and interest, shall be deemed to apply to the
payment, collection, administration and enforcement of the excise
tax on cannabis to the extent that those provisions do not conflict
with the provisions of NRS 372A.200 to 372A.380, inclusive [.] ,
and section 20 of this act.
Sec. 23. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 24. NRS 372A.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
372A.380 The remedies of the State provided for in NRS
372A.200 to 372A.380, inclusive, and section 20 of this act are
cumulative, and no action taken by the Department or the Attorney
General constitutes an election by the State to pursue any remedy to
the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in
those sections.
-
*AB203_R1*

– 33 –
Sec. 25. Chapter 374 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The provisions of this chapter relating to the imposition,
collection and remittance of the sales tax apply to a retailer who
makes a retail sale of cannabis or a cannabis product regardless
of whether the retailer holds a license issued pursuant to title 56 of
NRS.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cannabis” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.085.
(b) “Cannabis product” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.120.
Sec. 26. NRS 480.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
480.140 The primary functions and responsibilities of the
divisions of the Department are as follows:
1. The Investigation Division shall:
(a) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of chapter
453 of NRS relating to controlled substances and chapter 454 of
NRS relating to dangerous drugs;
(b) Investigate technological crime, as defined in NRS
205A.030, and enforce the provisions of the law of this State
relating to technological crime, as defined in NRS 205A.030;
(c) Provide investigative services to the divisions of the
Department as determined by the Director;
(d) Assist the Secretary of State in carrying out an investigation
pursuant to NRS 293.124;
(e) Upon request, assist:
(1) The Department of Taxation in carrying out a criminal
investigation relating to cannabis pursuant to NRS 372A.200 to
372A.380, inclusive, and section 20 of this act and chapter 678A of
NRS;
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services in carrying out a
criminal investigation relating to cannabis pursuant to chapter 678C
of NRS; and
(3) The Cannabis Compliance Board in carrying out a
criminal investigation pursuant to title 56 of NRS; and
(f) Perform such duties and exercise such powers as may be
conferred upon it pursuant to this chapter and any other specific
statute.
2. In addition to the functions and responsibilities set forth in
subsection 1, the Investigation Division shall collaborate with the
Cannabis Compliance Board and other state and local agencies,
including, without limitation, law enforcement agencies, for the
-
*AB203_R1*

– 34 –
enforcement of criminal laws relating to unlicensed cannabis
activities.
3. The Nevada Highway Patrol Division shall, in conjunction
with the Department of Motor Vehicles, execute, administer and
enforce the provisions of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS
and perform such duties and exercise such powers as may be
conferred upon it pursuant to NRS 480.360 and any other specific
statute.
[3.] 4. The State Fire Marshal Division shall execute,
administer and enforce the provisions of chapter 477 of NRS and
perform such duties and exercise such powers as may be conferred
upon it pursuant to chapter 477 of NRS and any other specific
statute.
[4.] 5. The Division of Parole and Probation shall execute,
administer and enforce the provisions of chapters 176A and 213 of
NRS relating to parole and probation and perform such duties and
exercise such powers as may be conferred upon it pursuant to those
chapters and any other specific statute.
[5.] 6. The Capitol Police Division shall assist in the
enforcement of subsection 1 of NRS 331.140.
[6.] 7. The Nevada Office of Cyber Defense Coordination
shall:
(a) Serve as the strategic planning, facilitating and coordinating
office for cybersecurity policy and planning in this State; and
(b) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of NRS
480.900 to 480.950, inclusive, and perform such duties and exercise
such powers as may be conferred upon it pursuant to NRS 480.900
to 480.950, inclusive, and any other specific statute.
[7.] 8. The Training Division shall provide training to the
employees of the Department.
[8.] 9. The Records, Communications and Compliance
Division shall:
(a) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of chapter
179A of NRS and perform such duties and exercise such powers as
may be conferred upon it pursuant to chapter 179A of NRS and any
other specific statute;
(b) Provide dispatch services for the Department and other
agencies as determined by the Director;
(c) Maintain records of the Department as determined by the
Director; and
(d) Provide support services to the Director, the divisions of the
Department and the Nevada Criminal Justice Information System as
may be imposed by the Director.
Sec. 27. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*AB203_R1*

– 35 –
Sec. 28. 1. On or before December 31, 2026, the Cannabis
Compliance Board and the Nevada Gaming Control Board shall
jointly prepare and submit a report concerning the relationship
between the gaming industry and the cannabis industry in this State
to the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for transmittal to the next regular session of the Legislature.
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) An examination of the federal laws and regulations
concerning cannabis;
(b) Recommendations as to whether and under what
circumstances gaming licensees should be authorized to invest in
cannabis establishments or otherwise work with the cannabis
industry in this State;
(c) An identification of any specific changes to federal law that
would be necessary or preferable in order to authorize gaming
licensees to invest in cannabis establishments or otherwise work
with the cannabis industry in this State; and
(d) An explanation of how the two boards will work together in
the event that changes to federal law leads to a closer relationship
between the gaming industry and the cannabis industry in this State.
3. In preparing the report required pursuant to subsection 1, the
Cannabis Compliance Board and the Nevada Gaming Control Board
shall consult with relevant research institutions and incorporate any
relevant input received from such research institutions into the
report.
4. The Cannabis Compliance Board and the Nevada Gaming
Commission may accept gifts, grants, donations, bequests and other
sources of money to carry out the provisions of this section.
5. As used in this section, “research institution” means a
university, college or other organization which has as one of its
principal purposes the conducting of medical, scientific or academic
research.
H
-
*AB203_R1*